Arkansas, session 2025, HB1495.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-510 is amended to read as follows:
6-18-510. Enrollment during expulsion — School policy.
The board of directors of any school district may adopt a policy that
any person who has been expelled as a student or is pending expulsion from
any other school district or private school may not enroll as a student until
the time of the person's expulsion has expired, provided that the receiving
school district board of directors affords the student the opportunity for a
hearing at the time the student is seeking enrollment.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 18, Subchapter 5, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-18-517. Student permanent school record — Disciplinary action.
(a)(1) If a student transfers to another public school within his or
her resident public school district or to a nonresident public school
district, then the student's permanent school record shall transfer with the
student to the other public school within his or her resident public school
district or to the nonresident public school district to which the student
transfers.
*TNL119*
03-31-2025 11:51:54 TNL119

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1495
(2) A student's permanent school record shall include
information regarding any disciplinary action taken against the student,
including without limitation an in-school suspension, out-of-school
suspension, pending expulsion, or expulsion.
(b)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (b)(2) of this section, if
a student has been expelled from or is pending an expulsion from a public
school or private school and transfers to a public school within his or her
resident public school district, a private school, or a nonresident public
school district, then the public school within the student's resident public
school district, the private school, or the nonresident public school
district to which the student transfers shall obtain the student's permanent
school record before the public school, private school, or nonresident public
school district may accept the student for transfer.
(2) For a student who is a foster child, a public school within
the student's resident public school district, a private school, or a
nonresident public school district to which the student transfers shall
request and receive the student's education records under § 9-28-113.
(c) A public school, private school, or public school district may
deny the transfer of a student who is pending expulsion proceedings or a
student who is serving a period of expulsion from a public school or private
school.
(d) Each public school, private school, and public school district
shall designate at least one (1) certified staff member or administrator to
verify the accuracy of a student's permanent school record under this
section.
(e) An individual who knowingly provides false or incomplete
information concerning a student's permanent school record under this section
may be found to be in violation of the Code of Ethics for Arkansas Educators.
(f) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall:
(1) Develop procedures for transferring permanent school records
under this section; and
(2) Promulgate rules to administer this section.

/s/Hawk


03-31-2025 11:51:54 TNL119